Colorado, session 2026A, SB034.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Auraria
Student and Faculty Board Voting Rights Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration - legislative intent.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Student and faculty representation in postsecondary institutions'
institutional governance promotes accountability, transparency, and
responsiveness to the educational needs of the student body;
(b) The Auraria higher education center has 3 separately governed
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

institutions whose students and faculty are materially affected by decisions
of the Auraria board of directors, known as the Auraria board;
(c) Granting the elected student and faculty members of the Auraria
board full voting rights strengthens shared governance by ensuring that
directly elected student and faculty representatives participate substantively
in decisions that affect students; and
(d) It is in the public interest to provide the elected student and
faculty members of the Auraria board with voting rights equal to that of
other board members.
(2) The general assembly further declares that this act does not alter
any statutory eligibility requirement for the elected faculty member of the
Auraria board, including residency requirements, except as expressly
provided in the act.
(3) It is the intent of the general assembly that:
(a) The Auraria board and each of the governing boards of the
constituent institutions of the Auraria higher education center will update
their policies, bylaws, and rules, including rules of procedure, as applicable
and as necessary to comply with the amendments to Auraria board
members' authority made in this act; and
(b) A student or faculty member serving on the Auraria board on the
effective date of this act assumes the voting rights granted to that member
in this act without needing to be reelected to the Auraria board.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-70-102, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(c)(I), (1)(c)(III), (1)(d)(I), and (2) as follows:
23-70-102. Auraria board - membership - terms - oath or
affirmation - voting.
(1) Effective July 1, 1989, There is created a new board of directors
of the Auraria higher education center, which consists of nine ELEVEN
voting members. and two ex officio nonvoting members. The members of
the Auraria board shall be ARE chosen in the following manner AS
FOLLOWS:
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-034

(c) (I) An advisory committee of six members who are full-time
students shall be IS elected, two from each of the student bodies of each of
the three institutions governed by the Auraria board. and it THE ADVISORY
COMMITTEE shall elect one of its members to fill one office on the Auraria
board to serve for one term A ONE-YEAR TERM beginning EACH July 1. The
elected student office is advisory, without the right to vote. The elected
student member of the board must have resided in the state of Colorado not
NO less than three years ONE YEAR prior to the member's election. A
vacancy in the office of the elected student member shall MUST be filled by
reelection for the unexpired term.
(III) In the event of death, resignation, or inability or refusal to act
of any such AN elected member of the student advisory committee, the
student governing body of the institution with the vacancy shall appoint a
full-time student from that institution to fill the vacancy for the remainder
of the term.
(d) (I) An advisory committee of six NINE members who are
full-time faculty members shall be IS elected, two THREE from each of the
faculties of each of the three institutions governed by the Auraria board. and
it THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE shall elect one of its members to fill the
remaining office on the Auraria board to serve for A one-year terms TERM
beginning each July 1. The committee shall select such a member from the
same institution only once in the same three-year period. The elected faculty
office is advisory, without the right to vote. The elected faculty member of
the board must have resided in the state of Colorado not NO less than three
years prior to the member's election. A vacancy in the office of the elected
faculty member shall MUST be filled by reelection for the unexpired term.
(2) (a) Each member of the Auraria board shall take an oath or
affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.
(b) MEMBERS OF THE AURARIA BOARD ARE FIDUCIARIES OF THE
CENTER, AND A MEMBER SHALL RECUSE THEMSELF FROM A VOTE OR
EXECUTIVE SESSION WHEN THEY HAVE A CONFLICT OF INTEREST. THE
AURARIA BOARD MAY ADOPT, THROUGH ITS BYLAWS AND POLICIES, A
COMPREHENSIVE FRAMEWORK DEFINING CONFLICTS OF INTEREST
APPLICABLE TO BOARD MEMBERS. THE BYLAWS AND POLICIES MAY
ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR IDENTIFYING POTENTIAL CONFLICTS, REQUIRE
DISCLOSURE OF RELEVANT INTERESTS, AND DESIGNATE A FINAL
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-034

DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY TO DETERMINE WHEN RECUSAL IS REQUIRED.
THE AURARIA BOARD SHALL ENSURE THAT THE BYLAWS AND POLICIES
PROVIDE CONSISTENT, FAIR, AND TRANSPARENT STANDARDS FOR RECUSAL
DETERMINATIONS.
SECTION 4. Effective date. This act takes effect October 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-034

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-034